Florida, session 2026, SB1560.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 132 133 Section 1.âPresent subsections (38) through (49), (50), and 134 (51) through (91) of section 39.01, Florida Statutes, are 135 redesignated as subsections (39) through (50), (52), and (54) 136 through (94), respectively, new subsections (38), (51), and (53) 137 are added to that section, and subsection (10) and present 138 subsection (39) of that section are amended, to read: 139 39.01âDefinitions.âWhen used in this chapter, unless the 140 context otherwise requires: 141 (10)ââCaregiverâ means the parent, legal custodian, 142 permanent guardian, adult household member, or other person 143 responsible for a childâs welfare as defined in subsection (60) 144 (57). 145 (38)ââHigh-acuity childâ means a child age birth to 18 who 146 presents with intensive and complex medical, developmental, 147 behavioral health, or disability needs across multiple areas of 148 functioning and who requires immediate clinical assessment and 149 specialized care, services, and medical placement. The term 150 includes a child who is reasonably presumed to meet the criteria 151 for high acuity. 152 (40)(39)ââInstitutional child abuse or neglectâ means 153 situations of known or suspected child abuse or neglect in which 154 the person allegedly perpetrating the child abuse or neglect is 155 an employee of a public or private school, public or private day 156 care center, residential home, institution, facility, or agency 157 or any other person at such institution responsible for the 158 childâs welfare as defined in subsection (60) (57). 159 (51)ââMedical bedâ means a licensed placement that meets 160 the criteria of a medical placement and is approved by the 161 applicable licensing authority, such as the Department of 162 Health, the Agency for Persons with Disabilities, the Agency for 163 Health Care Administration, or the department. 164 (53)ââMedical placementâ means a residential setting that 165 provides clinical oversight, licensed nursing care, and 166 therapeutic supports 24 hours a day, 7 days a week to adequately 167 address the immediate needs of a high-acuity child being placed 168 who requires intensive, specialized medical care consistent with 169 the standards of the Affordable Care Act and the Centers for 170 Medicare and Medicaid Services guidelines for pediatric medical 171 necessity. 172 Section 2.âPresent subsection (15) of section 39.01375, 173 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (16), and a new 174 subsection (15) is added to that section, to read: 175 39.01375âBest interest determination for placement.âThe 176 department, community-based care lead agency, or court shall 177 consider all of the following factors when determining whether a 178 proposed placement under this chapter is in the childâs best 179 interest: 180 (15)âThe intensive and complex medical, developmental, 181 behavioral health, or disability needs of a high-acuity child 182 and the need for medical placement under s. 39.4078 to address 183 the high-acuity childâs needs. 184 Section 3.âSubsection (1) of section 39.302, Florida 185 Statutes, is amended to read: 186 39.302âProtective investigations of institutional child 187 abuse, abandonment, or neglect.â 188 (1)âThe department shall conduct a child protective 189 investigation of each report of institutional child abuse, 190 abandonment, or neglect. Upon receipt of a report that alleges 191 that an employee or agent of the department, or any other entity 192 or person covered by s. 39.01(40) or (60) s. 39.01(39) or (57), 193 acting in an official capacity, has committed an act of child 194 abuse, abandonment, or neglect, the department shall initiate a 195 child protective investigation within the timeframe established 196 under s. 39.101(2) and notify the appropriate state attorney, 197 law enforcement agency, and licensing agency, which shall 198 immediately conduct a joint investigation, unless independent 199 investigations are more feasible. When conducting investigations 200 or having face-to-face interviews with the child, investigation 201 visits shall be unannounced unless it is determined by the 202 department or its agent that unannounced visits threaten the 203 safety of the child. If a facility is exempt from licensing, the 204 department shall inform the owner or operator of the facility of 205 the report. Each agency conducting a joint investigation is 206 entitled to full access to the information gathered by the 207 department in the course of the investigation. A protective 208 investigation must include an interview with the childâs parent 209 or legal guardian. The department shall make a full written 210 report to the state attorney within 3 business days after making 211 the oral report. A criminal investigation shall be coordinated, 212 whenever possible, with the child protective investigation of 213 the department. Any interested person who has information 214 regarding the offenses described in this subsection may forward 215 a statement to the state attorney as to whether prosecution is 216 warranted and appropriate. Within 15 days after the completion 217 of the investigation, the state attorney shall report the 218 findings to the department and shall include in the report a 219 determination of whether or not prosecution is justified and 220 appropriate in view of the circumstances of the specific case. 221 Section 4.âSubsections (3) and (7) and paragraph (a) of 222 subsection (9) of section 39.303, Florida Statutes, are amended, 223 and paragraph (j) is added to subsection (4) of that section, to 224 read: 225 39.303âChild Protection Teams and sexual abuse treatment 226 programs; services; eligible cases.â 227 (3)âThe Department of Health shall use and convene the 228 Child Protection Teams to supplement the assessment and 229 protective supervision activities of the family safety and 230 preservation program of the Department of Children and Families. 231 This section does not remove or reduce the duty and 232 responsibility of any person to report pursuant to this chapter 233 all suspected or actual cases of child abuse, abandonment, or 234 neglect or sexual abuse of a child. The role of the Child 235 Protection Teams is to support activities of the program and to 236 provide services, including services necessary and appropriate 237 to address the needs of a high-acuity child, deemed by the Child 238 Protection Teams to be necessary and appropriate to abused, 239 abandoned, and neglected children upon referral. The specialized 240 diagnostic assessment, evaluation, coordination, consultation, 241 and other supportive services that a Child Protection Team must 242 be capable of providing include, but are not limited to, the 243 following: 244 (a)âMedical diagnosis and evaluation services, including 245 provision or interpretation of X rays and laboratory tests, and 246 related services, as needed, and documentation of related 247 findings. 248 (b)âTelephone consultation services in emergencies and in 249 other situations. 250 (c)âMedical evaluation related to abuse, abandonment, or 251 neglect, as defined by policy or rule of the Department of 252 Health. 253 (d)âSuch psychological and psychiatric diagnosis and 254 evaluation services for the child or the childâs parent or 255 parents, legal custodian or custodians, or other caregivers, or 256 any other individual involved in a child abuse, abandonment, or 257 neglect case, as the team may determine to be needed. 258 (e)âExpert medical, psychological, and related professional 259 testimony in court cases. 260 (f)âCase staffings to develop treatment plans for children 261 whose cases have been referred to the team. A Child Protection 262 Team may provide consultation with respect to a child who is 263 alleged or is shown to be abused, abandoned, or neglected, which 264 consultation shall be provided at the request of a 265 representative of the family safety and preservation program or 266 at the request of any other professional involved with a child 267 or the childâs parent or parents, legal custodian or custodians, 268 or other caregivers. In every such Child Protection Team case 269 staffing, consultation, or staff activity involving a child, a 270 family safety and preservation program representative shall 271 attend and participate. 272 (g)âCase service coordination and assistance, including the 273 location of services available from other public and private 274 agencies in the community. 275 (h)âSuch training services for program and other employees 276 of the Department of Children and Families, employees of the 277 Department of Health, and other medical professionals as is 278 deemed appropriate to enable them to develop and maintain their 279 professional skills and abilities in handling child abuse, 280 abandonment, and neglect cases. The training service must 281 include training in the recognition of and appropriate responses 282 to head trauma and brain injury in a child under 6 years of age 283 as required by ss. 402.402(2) and 409.988. 284 (i)âEducational and community awareness campaigns on child 285 abuse, abandonment, and neglect in an effort to enable citizens 286 more successfully to prevent, identify, and treat child abuse, 287 abandonment, and neglect in the community. 288 (j)âChild Protection Team assessments that include, as 289 appropriate, medical evaluations, medical consultations, family 290 psychosocial interviews, specialized clinical interviews, or 291 forensic interviews. 292 (k)âIdentification of a child who meets the criteria for a 293 high-acuity child and the basis for the determination of the 294 Child Protection Team. 295 296 A Child Protection Team that is evaluating a report of medical 297 neglect and assessing the health care needs of a medically 298 complex child shall consult with a physician who has experience 299 in treating children with the same condition. 300 (4)âThe child abuse, abandonment, and neglect reports that 301 must be referred by the department to Child Protection Teams of 302 the Department of Health for an assessment and other appropriate 303 available support services as set forth in subsection (3) must 304 include cases involving: 305 (j)âA report involving a high-acuity child or a child 306 believed to meet the criteria of a high-acuity child. 307 (7)(a)âIn all instances in which a Child Protection Team is 308 providing certain services to abused, abandoned, or neglected 309 children, other offices and units of the Department of Health, 310 and offices and units of the Department of Children and 311 Families, the Agency for Persons with Disabilities, and the 312 Agency for Health Care Administration must shall avoid 313 duplicating the provision of those services. 314 (b)âA Child Protection Team may: 315 1.âPrioritize the placement of a high-acuity child into a 316 specialized and appropriate placement in accordance with s. 317 39.4078, including, but not limited to, a medical bed or group 318 home in a facility licensed or maintained by the department, the 319 Agency for Persons with Disabilities, the Department of Health, 320 or the Agency for Health Care Administration, even if such 321 placement is outside of the normal services of the Child 322 Protection Team. 323 2.âRequire the provision of services to the high-acuity 324 child by an entity deemed appropriate and necessary by the Child 325 Protection Team for the stabilization, treatment, or safety of 326 the high-acuity child, even if such services are outside of the 327 normal services of the Child Protection Team. 328 (9)(a)âChildrenâs Medical Services shall convene a task 329 force to develop a standardized protocol for forensic 330 interviewing of children suspected of having been abused. The 331 Department of Health shall provide staff to the task force as 332 necessary. The task force shall include: 333 1.âA representative from the Florida Prosecuting Attorneys 334 Association. 335 2.âA representative from the Florida Psychological 336 Association. 337 3.âThe Statewide Medical Director for Child Protection. 338 4.âA representative from the Florida Public Defender 339 Association. 340 5.âThe executive director of the Statewide Guardian ad 341 Litem Office. 342 6.âA representative from a community-based care lead 343 agency. 344 7.âA representative from Childrenâs Medical Services. 345 8.âA representative from the Florida Sheriffs Association. 346 9.âA representative from the Florida Chapter of the 347 American Academy of Pediatrics. 348 10.âA representative from the Florida Network of Childrenâs 349 Advocacy Centers. 350 11.âOther representatives designated by Childrenâs Medical 351 Services. 352 12.âAn expert or a direct care provider who has experience 353 in serving high-acuity children. 354 Section 5.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 355 39.4021, Florida Statutes, is amended, and subsection (3) is 356 added to that section, to read: 357 39.4021âPriority placement for out-of-home placements.â 358 (2)âPLACEMENT PRIORITY.â 359 (a)âExcept as provided in subsection (3), when a child 360 cannot safely remain at home with a parent, out-of-home 361 placement options must be considered in the following order: 362 1.âNonoffending parent. 363 2.âRelative caregiver. 364 3.âAdoptive parent of the childâs sibling, when the 365 department or community-based care lead agency is aware of such 366 sibling. 367 4.âFictive kin with a close existing relationship to the 368 child. 369 5.âNonrelative caregiver that does not have an existing 370 relationship with the child. 371 6.âLicensed foster care. 372 7.âGroup or congregate care. 373 (3)âMEDICAL PLACEMENT FOR A HIGH-ACUITY CHILD.âIn cases in 374 which a child is identified or assessed as a high-acuity child, 375 the department or any contractor or subcontractor of the 376 department must follow the procedures and requirements in s. 377 39.4078 and place the high-acuity child in a medical placement 378 if he or she meets the eligibility criteria in order to ensure 379 the high-acuity childâs complex medical, behavioral, and 380 developmental needs are addressed in an appropriate medical 381 setting. 382 Section 6.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2), paragraph (b) 383 of subsection (3), paragraph (a) of subsection (4), paragraph 384 (a) of subsection (5), and paragraph (d) of subsection (6) of 385 section 39.4022, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 386 39.4022âMultidisciplinary teams; staffings; assessments; 387 report.â 388 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âFor purposes of this section, the term: 389 (c)ââMultidisciplinary teamâ means an integrated group of 390 individuals which meets to collaboratively develop and attempt 391 to reach a consensus decision on the most suitable out-of-home 392 placement or the appropriateness of a medical placement under s. 393 39.4078, educational placement, or other specified important 394 life decision that is in the best interest of the child. 395 (3)âCREATION AND GOALS.â 396 (b)âThe multidisciplinary teams must adhere to all of the 397 following goals: 398 1.âSecure a childâs safety in the least restrictive and 399 intrusive placement that can meet his or her needs.; 400 2.âMinimize the trauma associated with separation from the 401 childâs family and help the child to maintain meaningful 402 connections with family members and others who are important to 403 him or her.; 404 3.âProvide input into the proposed placement decision made 405 by the community-based care lead agency and the proposed 406 services to be provided in order to support the child.; 407 4.âProvide input into the decision to preserve or maintain 408 the placement, including necessary placement preservation 409 strategies.; 410 5.âContribute to an ongoing assessment of the child and the 411 familyâs strengths and needs.; 412 6.âEnsure that plans are monitored for progress and that 413 such plans are revised or updated as the childâs or familyâs 414 circumstances change.; and 415 7.âEnsure that the child and family always remain the 416 primary focus of each multidisciplinary team meeting. 417 8.âEnsure that if the child meets the classification of a 418 high-acuity child, the multidisciplinary team considers such 419 classification when determining the appropriate placement for 420 the child. The multidisciplinary team must prioritize the 421 placement of a high-acuity child in appropriate specialized 422 placements within the department, the Agency for Persons with 423 Disabilities, the Department of Health, or the Agency for Health 424 Care Administration. 425 (4)âPARTICIPANTS.â 426 (a)âCollaboration among diverse individuals who are part of 427 the childâs network is necessary to make the most informed 428 decisions possible for the child. A diverse team is preferable 429 to ensure that the necessary combination of technical skills, 430 cultural knowledge, community resources, and personal 431 relationships is developed and maintained for the child and 432 family. The participants necessary to achieve an appropriately 433 diverse team for a child may vary by child and may include 434 extended family, friends, neighbors, coaches, clergy, coworkers, 435 or others the family identifies as potential sources of support. 436 1.âEach multidisciplinary team staffing must invite all of 437 the following members: 438 a.âThe child, unless he or she is not of an age or capacity 439 to participate in the team, and the childâs guardian ad litem.; 440 b.âThe childâs family members and other individuals 441 identified by the family as being important to the child, 442 provided that a parent who has a no contact order or injunction, 443 is alleged to have sexually abused the child, or is subject to a 444 termination of parental rights may not participate.; 445 c.âThe current caregiver, provided the caregiver is not a 446 parent who meets the criteria of one of the exceptions under 447 sub-subparagraph b.; 448 d.âA representative from the department other than the 449 Childrenâs Legal Services attorney, when the department is 450 directly involved in the goal identified by the staffing.; 451 e.âA representative from the community-based care lead 452 agency, when the lead agency is directly involved in the goal 453 identified by the staffing.; 454 f.âThe case manager for the child, or his or her case 455 manager supervisor.; and 456 g.âA representative from the Department of Juvenile 457 Justice, if the child is dually involved with both the 458 department and the Department of Juvenile Justice. The 459 representative must have the authority to make a same-day 460 placement of a high-acuity child in an appropriate medical 461 placement in the Department of Juvenile Justice if necessary. 462 h.âA representative from the Agency for Persons with 463 Disabilities who has the authority to make a same-day placement 464 of a high-acuity child in an appropriate medical placement in 465 the agency if such child meets the eligibility criteria under s. 466 393.065 and is in a preenrollment category. 467 2.âThe multidisciplinary team must make reasonable efforts 468 to have all mandatory invitees attend. However, the 469 multidisciplinary team staffing may not be delayed if the 470 invitees in subparagraph 1. fail to attend after being provided 471 reasonable opportunities. 472 (5)âSCOPE OF MULTIDISCIPLINARY TEAM.â 473 (a)âA multidisciplinary team staffing must be held when an 474 important decision is required to be made about a childâs life, 475 including all of the following: 476 1.âInitial placement decisions for a child who is placed in 477 out-of-home care. A multidisciplinary team staffing required 478 under this subparagraph may occur before the initial placement 479 or, if a staffing is not possible before the initial placement, 480 must occur as soon as possible after initial removal and 481 placement to evaluate the appropriateness of the initial 482 placement and to ensure that any adjustments to the placement, 483 if necessary, are promptly handled. 484 2.âChanges in physical custody after the child is placed in 485 out-of-home care by a court and, if necessary, determination of 486 an appropriate mandatory transition plan in accordance with s. 487 39.4023. 488 3.âChanges in a childâs educational placement and, if 489 necessary, determination of an appropriate mandatory transition 490 plan in accordance with s. 39.4023. 491 4.âInitial placement decisions or a change in placement for 492 a high-acuity child in a medical placement under s. 39.4078, as 493 appropriate, to stabilize such child. 494 5.4.âPlacement decisions for a child as required by 495 subparagraph 1., subparagraph 2., or subparagraph 3., or 496 subparagraph 4. which involve sibling groups that require 497 placement in accordance with s. 39.4024. 498 6.5.âAny other important decisions in the childâs life 499 which are so complex that the department or appropriate 500 community-based care lead agency determines convening a 501 multidisciplinary team staffing is necessary to ensure the best 502 interest of the child is maintained. 503 (6)âASSESSMENTS.â 504 (d)1.âIf the participants of a multidisciplinary team 505 staffing reach a unanimous consensus decision, it becomes the 506 official position of the community-based care lead agency 507 regarding the decision under subsection (5) for which the team 508 convened. Such decision is binding upon all department and lead 509 agency participants, who are obligated to support it. 510 2.a.âIf the participants of a multidisciplinary team 511 staffing cannot reach a unanimous consensus decision on a plan 512 to address the identified goal of a child who has not been 513 classified as a high-acuity child, the trained professional 514 acting as the facilitator shall notify the court and the 515 department within 48 hours after the conclusion of the staffing. 516 The department shall then determine how to address the 517 identified goal of the staffing by what is in the childâs best 518 interest. 519 b.âIf the participants of a multidisciplinary team staffing 520 cannot reach a unanimous consensus decision on a plan to address 521 the appropriate initial placement or change in placement of a 522 high-acuity child, the trained professional acting as the 523 facilitator must notify the court and the department within 48 524 hours after the conclusion of the staffing. The court must set 525 an emergency evidentiary hearing within 10 days after such 526 notification to address the appropriate initial placement or 527 change in placement of the high-acuity child and determine if 528 the high-acuity child should be placed in a medical placement in 529 accordance with s. 39.4078. The court may require the 530 representative from a community-based care lead agency or the 531 department who was required to attend the multidisciplinary team 532 staffing to attend the evidentiary hearing. 533 Section 7.âSubsection (1), paragraph (b) of subsection (4), 534 and subsection (6) of section 39.407, Florida Statutes, are 535 amended to read: 536 39.407âMedical, psychiatric, and psychological examination 537 and treatment of child; physical, mental, or substance abuse 538 examination of person with or requesting child custody.â 539 (1)âWhen any child is removed from the home and maintained 540 in an out-of-home placement, the department is authorized to 541 have a medical screening performed on the child without 542 authorization from the court and without consent from a parent 543 or legal custodian. Such medical screening shall be performed by 544 A licensed health care professional must perform such medical 545 screening and shall be to examine the child, in part, for 546 injury;, illness; mental, disability, or behavioral health 547 conditions;, and communicable diseases and to determine the need 548 for immunization. The department shall by rule establish the 549 invasiveness of the medical procedures authorized to be 550 performed under this subsection. In no case does This subsection 551 does not: 552 (a)âAuthorize the department to consent to medical 553 treatment for such children; or 554 (b)âLimit the procedures for a medical placement of a high 555 acuity child established under s. 39.4078. 556 (4) 557 (b)âThe judge may also order such child to be evaluated by 558 a psychiatrist or a psychologist or, if a developmental 559 disability is suspected or alleged, by the developmental 560 disability diagnostic and evaluation team of the department. If 561 it is necessary to place a child in a residential facility for 562 such evaluation, the criteria and procedure established in s. 563 394.463(2) or chapter 393 must shall be used, whichever is 564 applicable. If, after the evaluation is conducted under this 565 paragraph, the psychiatrist, psychologist, or developmental 566 disability diagnostic and evaluation team determines that the 567 child meets the criteria to be classified as a high-acuity child 568 under s. 39.4078, the judge must immediately order the high 569 acuity child to be placed in a medical placement to address the 570 basis for the childâs high-acuity needs, even if there are other 571 placement options available under s. 39.4021. 572 (6)âChildren in the legal custody of the department may be 573 placed by the department, without prior approval of the court, 574 in a residential treatment center licensed under s. 394.875 or a 575 hospital licensed under chapter 395 for residential mental 576 health treatment only pursuant to this section or may be placed 577 by the court in accordance with an order of involuntary 578 examination or involuntary placement entered pursuant to s. 579 394.463 or s. 394.467. A high-acuity child may be placed in a 580 residential treatment program or medical placement, as 581 appropriate, which best meets the needs of the high-acuity child 582 based on the high-acuity childâs complex medical, developmental, 583 behavioral health, or disability needs. All children placed in a 584 residential treatment program under this subsection must have a 585 guardian ad litem appointed. 586 (a)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 587 1.ââLeast restrictive alternativeâ means the treatment and 588 conditions of treatment that, separately and in combination, are 589 no more intrusive or restrictive of freedom than reasonably 590 necessary to achieve a substantial therapeutic benefit or to 591 protect the child or adolescent or others from physical injury. 592 2.ââResidential treatmentâ or âresidential treatment 593 programâ means a placement for observation, diagnosis, or 594 treatment of an emotional disturbance in a residential treatment 595 center licensed under s. 394.875 or a hospital licensed under 596 chapter 395. The term includes a medical placement under s. 597 39.4078 for a high-acuity child who presents with needs that are 598 not suitable for treatment in a standard foster care or 599 therapeutic group home environment due to the complexity of the 600 needs or the potential for harm to others in the same care 601 setting. 602 3.ââSuitable for residential treatmentâ or âsuitabilityâ 603 means a determination concerning a child or adolescent who is 604 classified as a high-acuity child or a child or adolescent with 605 an emotional disturbance as defined in s. 394.492(5) or a 606 serious emotional disturbance as defined in s. 394.492(6) that 607 each of the following criteria is met: 608 a.âThe child requires residential treatment. 609 b.âThe child is in need of a residential treatment program 610 and is expected to benefit from mental or behavioral health 611 treatment, or a combination of treatment. 612 c.âAn appropriate, less restrictive alternative to 613 residential treatment is unavailable. 614 4.ââTherapeutic group homeâ means a residential treatment 615 center that offers a 24-hour residential program providing 616 community-based mental health treatment and mental health 617 support services to children who meet the criteria in s. 618 394.492(5) or (6) in a nonsecure, homelike setting. 619 (b)âIf Whenever the department believes that a child in its 620 legal custody is emotionally disturbed or is classified or 621 likely to be classified as a high-acuity child under s. 39.4078 622 and may need residential treatment, an examination and 623 suitability assessment must be conducted by a qualified 624 evaluator appointed by the department. This suitability 625 assessment must be completed before the placement of the child 626 in a residential treatment program. 627 1.âThe qualified evaluator for placement in a residential 628 treatment center, other than a therapeutic group home, or a 629 hospital must be a psychiatrist or a psychologist licensed in 630 this state who has at least 3 years of experience in the 631 diagnosis and treatment of serious emotional disturbances in 632 children and adolescents and who has no actual or perceived 633 conflict of interest with any inpatient facility or residential 634 treatment center or program. 635 2.âThe qualified evaluator for placement in a therapeutic 636 group home must be a psychiatrist licensed under chapter 458 or 637 chapter 459, a psychologist licensed under chapter 490, or a 638 mental health counselor licensed under chapter 491 who has at 639 least 2 years of experience in the diagnosis and treatment of 640 serious emotional, medical, developmental, or behavioral 641 disturbances disturbance in children, including high-acuity 642 children, and adolescents and who has no actual or perceived 643 conflict of interest with any residential treatment center or 644 program. 645 (c)1.âConsistent with the requirements of this section, the 646 child shall be assessed for suitability for residential 647 treatment by a qualified evaluator who has conducted an 648 examination and assessment of the child and has made written 649 findings that: 650 a.1.âThe child appears to have an emotional disturbance 651 serious enough to require treatment in a residential treatment 652 program and is reasonably likely to benefit from the treatment. 653 b.2.âThe child has been provided with a clinically 654 appropriate explanation of the nature and purpose of the 655 treatment. 656 c.3.âAll available modalities of treatment less restrictive 657 than residential treatment have been considered, and a less 658 restrictive alternative that would offer comparable benefits to 659 the child is unavailable. 660 2.âA copy of the written findings of the evaluation and 661 suitability assessment must be provided to the department, to 662 the guardian ad litem, and, if the child is a member of a 663 Medicaid managed care plan, to the plan that is financially 664 responsible for the childâs care in residential treatment, all 665 of whom must be provided with the opportunity to discuss the 666 findings with the evaluator. 667 3.âIf the written findings of the evaluation and 668 suitability assessment state that the child meets the criteria 669 of a high-acuity child and there is not a suitable residential 670 treatment program or medical placement for the high-acuity child 671 identified within 5 business days after the written findings are 672 provided to the department and guardian ad litem, the high 673 acuity childâs guardian ad litem must notify the court within 24 674 hours after the expiration of the 5-day time period that there 675 is a failure to identify a suitable placement. Within 5 business 676 days after receiving such notification, the court must set an 677 emergency evidentiary hearing to determine the most suitable 678 placement for the high-acuity child in accordance with s. 679 39.4078. The court may prioritize the placement of a high-acuity 680 child who is being placed or currently residing in foster care 681 to a specialized and appropriate placement, including, but not 682 limited to, a medical bed or group home in a facility licensed 683 or maintained by the department, the Agency for Persons with 684 Disabilities, the Department of Health, or the Agency for Health 685 Care Administration. 686 (d)âImmediately upon placing a child in a residential 687 treatment program under this section, the department must notify 688 the guardian ad litem and the court having jurisdiction over the 689 child. Within 5 days after the departmentâs receipt of the 690 assessment, the department shall provide the guardian ad litem 691 and the court with a copy of the assessment by the qualified 692 evaluator. 693 (e)âWithin 10 days after the admission of a child to a 694 residential treatment program, the director of the residential 695 treatment program or the directorâs designee must ensure that an 696 individualized plan of treatment has been prepared by the 697 program and has been explained to the child, to the department, 698 and to the guardian ad litem, and submitted to the department. 699 The child must be involved in the preparation of the plan to the 700 maximum feasible extent consistent with his or her ability to 701 understand and participate, and the guardian ad litem and the 702 childâs foster parents must be involved to the maximum extent 703 consistent with the childâs treatment needs. The plan must 704 include a preliminary plan for residential treatment and 705 aftercare upon completion of residential treatment. The plan 706 must include specific behavioral and emotional goals against 707 which the success of the residential treatment may be measured. 708 A copy of the plan must be provided to the child, to the 709 guardian ad litem, and to the department. 710 (f)âWithin 30 days after admission, the residential 711 treatment program must review the appropriateness and 712 suitability of the childâs placement in the program. The 713 residential treatment program must determine whether the child 714 is receiving benefit toward the treatment goals and whether the 715 child could be treated in a less restrictive treatment program. 716 The residential treatment program shall prepare a written report 717 of its findings and submit the report to the guardian ad litem 718 and to the department. The department must submit the report to 719 the court. The report must include a discharge plan for the 720 child. The residential treatment program must continue to 721 evaluate the childâs treatment progress every 30 days thereafter 722 and must include its findings in a written report submitted to 723 the department. The department may not reimburse a facility 724 until the facility has submitted every written report that is 725 due. 726 (g)1.âThe department must submit, at the beginning of each 727 month, to the court having jurisdiction over the child, a 728 written report regarding the childâs progress toward achieving 729 the goals specified in the individualized plan of treatment. 730 2.âThe court must conduct a hearing to review the status of 731 the childâs residential treatment plan no later than 60 days 732 after the childâs admission to the residential treatment 733 program. An independent review of the childâs progress toward 734 achieving the goals and objectives of the treatment plan must be 735 completed by a qualified evaluator and submitted to the court 736 before its 60-day review. 737 3.âFor any child in residential treatment at the time a 738 judicial review is held pursuant to s. 39.701, the childâs 739 continued placement in residential treatment must be a subject 740 of the judicial review. 741 4.âIf at any time the court determines that the child is 742 not suitable for continued residential treatment, the court 743 shall order the department to place the child in the least 744 restrictive setting that is best suited to meet his or her 745 needs. 746 (h)âAfter the initial 60-day review, the court must conduct 747 a review of the childâs residential treatment plan every 90 748 days. 749 Section 8.âSection 39.4078, Florida Statutes, is created to 750 read: 751 39.4078âMedical Placement for High-acuity Children Act.â 752 (1)âSHORT TITLE.âThis section may be cited as the âMedical 753 Placement for High-acuity Children Act.â 754 (2)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.â 755 (a)âThe Legislature finds that high-acuity children, 756 particularly those with disabilities, who are entering or 757 currently involved in the child protection system in this state 758 require prompt and specialized medical health assessments, as 759 well as appropriate medical placements. 760 (b)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to establish a 761 time-limited, court-supervised process for the medical placement 762 of high-acuity children which: 763 1.âEnsures the high-acuity child receives medically 764 necessary treatment and stabilization in the least restrictive 765 setting that can safely meet the childâs needs. 766 2.âCoordinates judicial oversight with clinical assessment, 767 case planning, and transition planning. 768 3.âPromotes a prompt transfer to a less restrictive setting 769 as acute symptoms resolve, while preserving the high-acuity 770 childâs rights to education, visitation, and normalcy. 771 (3)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 772 (a)ââCommunity-based care lead agencyâ has the same meaning 773 as in s. 409.986(3). 774 (b)ââMultidisciplinary teamâ has the same meaning as in s. 775 39.4022(2). 776 (4)âAPPLICABILITY.âThis section applies to the assessment, 777 eligibility, placement, case plan tasks, transfers to more or 778 less restrictive settings, and discharge of high-acuity children 779 in medical placements. This section operates in accordance with 780 ss. 39.4022, 39.407, 39.523, and 39.6013; however, if this 781 section conflicts with another section of law, this section 782 prevails to the extent necessary to address the needs of a high 783 acuity child. 784 (5)âMEDICAL PLACEMENT.âA medical placement may include all 785 of the following, as clinically appropriate and subject to 786 applicable licensure under chapter 394, chapter 395, chapter 787 400, or chapter 409: 788 (a)âAcute care beds for short-term intensive medical or 789 psychiatric treatment. 790 (b)âSubacute beds for continued clinical support after 791 acute care. 792 (c)âTherapeutic medical foster care providing in-home 793 medical services directed by a licensed health care 794 professional. 795 (d)âSpecialized residential treatment programs for children 796 with significant co-occurring medical and behavioral health 797 conditions. 798 (e)âPlacements that meet the requirements of the pilot 799 program of treatment foster care under s. 409.996(27). 800 (f)âOther licensed settings capable of delivering 801 equivalent medically necessary services to a high-acuity child 802 in the least restrictive environment. 803 (6)âREQUIREMENTS OF A MEDICAL PLACEMENT.âA medical 804 placement must do all of the following: 805 (a)âStabilize the high-acuity childâs acute symptoms and 806 address any immediate safety risks. 807 (b)âInitiate or continue evidence-based treatment and 808 medication management, consistent with s. 39.407. 809 (c)âMaintain the high-acuity childâs educational services 810 and reasonable family and sibling contact. 811 (d)âDevelop clear, time-limited clinical and functional 812 goals that determine when the high-acuity child is ready for a 813 less restrictive setting. 814 (e)âCreate a plan for placement and services that address 815 the range of needs of the high-acuity child from his or her 816 admission to a medical bed until he or she transitions to a less 817 restrictive setting and eventually reaches permanency. 818 (f)âEnsure that high-acuity children in the custody of the 819 department under this chapter are given priority for placements 820 in the most appropriate facilities licensed or maintained by the 821 Agency for Persons with Disabilities, the Agency for Health Care 822 Administration, the Department of Health, or the department, as 823 applicable. 824 (7)âASSESSMENT AND ADMISSION.â 825 (a)âBefore admission to a medical placement, or within 24 826 hours after an emergency admission, a Child Protection Team must 827 collaborate with the department or community-based care lead 828 agency to obtain a comprehensive clinical assessment conducted 829 by a qualified licensed professional which identifies a high 830 acuity childâs needs, recommended level of care, and anticipated 831 length of stay. 832 (b)âIn accordance with s. 39.4022, a multidisciplinary team 833 staffing must occur within 72 hours after a child is classified 834 as a high-acuity child, and the staffing must include all 835 necessary participants who can appropriately address the basis 836 for classifying the child as a high-acuity child. 837 (c)âThe multidisciplinary team staffing must recommend the 838 least restrictive medical bed placement that is capable of 839 meeting the needs of the high-acuity child and identify 840 measurable goals and criteria for less restrictive placement. 841 The recommendations of the multidisciplinary team staffing must 842 be filed with a court pursuant to subsection (8). 843 (d)âIf the multidisciplinary team staffing cannot reach a 844 consensus on the placement of a high-acuity child, a designated 845 person present at the staffing must notify the court and, within 846 10 days after such notification, the court must hold an 847 emergency evidentiary hearing in accordance with s. 848 39.4022(6)(d)2.b. 849 (8)âCOURT APPROVAL AND WRITTEN FINDINGS.â 850 (a)âWithin 72 hours after a multidisciplinary team staffing 851 at which a consensus is reached to place a high-acuity child in 852 a medical placement, the department shall petition the court for 853 approval of such placement. The petition must include a copy of 854 the comprehensive clinical assessment and recommendations of the 855 multidisciplinary team staffing. 856 (b)âThe court shall conduct an evidentiary hearing and 857 provide written findings on all of the following: 858 1.âThe medical, behavioral, or complex conditions of the 859 child which are the basis for classifying the child as a high 860 acuity child. 861 2.âWhether the medical bed suggested by the 862 multidisciplinary team staffing is the least restrictive setting 863 available for the high-acuity child. 864 3.âClearly defined goals and criteria for the high-acuity 865 child to enter a less restrictive placement. 866 4.âThe appropriate timeframe in which the case plan must be 867 updated to address the written findings of the court. 868 (c)âConsent and authorization for medical, psychiatric, and 869 behavioral health services must be obtained and documented in 870 accordance with s. 39.407. 871 (d)âThe court must ensure that a high-acuity childâs 872 educational services, including any individualized education 873 program services if applicable, continue without interruption 874 and that reasonable family and sibling contact occurs unless 875 such contact is against clinical judgment and court order. 876 (9)âPERIODIC REVIEWS.âWithin 30 days after the court 877 provides its written findings under subsection (8), and every 30 878 days thereafter for as long as the high-acuity child remains in 879 a medical placement, the court must review the high-acuity 880 childâs progress through acute presentation of complex 881 behaviors. Each review must include updated clinical reports, 882 the progress of the high-acuity child toward defined goals that 883 address the stabilization and treatment of any identified high 884 acuity behaviors, educational progress, family and sibling 885 contact, and a recommendation regarding whether the high-acuity 886 child is ready for a less restrictive setting. Within 5 days 887 before each review hearing, the department must file with the 888 court an updated report that includes a recommendation for 889 maintaining the medical placement or, if appropriate, 890 transferring the high-acuity child to a less restrictive 891 setting. The multidisciplinary team staffing shall reconvene 892 before each review unless such requirement is waived by the 893 court. 894 (10)âPLACEMENT PROCEDURES.â 895 (a)âUpon motion of any party or on the courtâs own motion, 896 and based on competent substantial evidence of the high-acuity 897 childâs clinical status, the court may immediately order the 898 high-acuity child to be moved to a less or more restrictive 899 licensed placement as indicated by the presence or resolution of 900 acute symptoms without having to wait for a regularly scheduled 901 review. 902 (b)âThe department may implement emergency procedures for 903 moving a high-acuity child to a more restrictive setting for the 904 safety of the high-acuity child or based on medical necessity. 905 The department shall notify the court and all parties within 24 906 hours after implementation of emergency procedures. The court 907 shall set the matter for a hearing within 3 days after being 908 notified of the implementation of emergency procedures. 909 (c)âThe transition between placements of a high-acuity 910 child must comply with s. 39.523 and include a written 911 transition plan that addresses medication continuity, treatment 912 hand-offs, education, and family and sibling contact of the 913 high-acuity child. 914 (11)âCASE PLAN.âA high-acuity childâs case plan must be 915 updated within 7 days after court approval under subsection (8) 916 and after each review under subsection (9) to reflect placement 917 goals and transition planning. 918 (12)âDURATION OF A MEDICAL PLACEMENT.â 919 (a)âA medical placement may not exceed 90 consecutive days 920 without express written consent by the court, supported by clear 921 and convincing evidence that the medical placement remains 922 medically necessary and is the least restrictive setting 923 available to safely meet the needs of the high-acuity child. 924 (b)âThis section does not authorize the placement of a 925 high-acuity child in a setting prohibited by federal or state 926 law or rule. 927 (13)âRIGHTS OF HIGH-ACUITY CHILDREN.âUnless otherwise 928 ordered by the court, a high-acuity child who is in a medical 929 placement retains all rights under this chapter, including, but 930 not limited to, access to an attorney ad litem and a guardian ad 931 litem, reasonable visitation with family and siblings, 932 individualized education program services, and participation in 933 case plan development based on the age and capacity of the high 934 acuity child. 935 (14)âANNUAL REPORT.â 936 (a)âThe department shall collect data relating to the 937 Medical Placement for High-acuity Children Act, including 938 admissions, placement types, lengths of stay, goals achieved, 939 outcomes of less restrictive settings, recidivism, education 940 continuity, family and sibling contact, and time to permanency. 941 Community-based care lead agencies and providers must furnish to 942 the department any data required to comply with this subsection. 943 (b)âBy January 31, 2027, and annually thereafter, the 944 department shall submit to the President of the Senate and the 945 Speaker of the House of Representatives a report relating to 946 utilization, outcomes, and service gaps of and recommendations 947 regarding the Medical Placement for High-acuity Children Act. 948 (15)âCONSTRUCTION.âThis section may not be construed to 949 limit the requirements of medical consent under s. 39.407 or the 950 courtâs authority under s. 39.522. 951 (16)âRULEMAKING.âThe department and the Department of 952 Health may adopt rules to implement this section. 953 Section 9.âParagraphs (c) and (d) of subsection (1) and 954 subsection (2) of section 39.523, Florida Statutes, are amended, 955 and paragraph (e) is added to subsection (1) of that section, to 956 read: 957 39.523âPlacement in out-of-home care.â 958 (1)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.â 959 (c)âThe Legislature also finds that the timely 960 identification of and therapeutic response to acute presentation 961 of symptoms indicative of trauma or high-acuity complex needs 962 can reduce adverse outcomes for a child, aid in the 963 identification of services to enhance initial placement 964 stability and of supports to caregivers, and reduce placement 965 disruption. 966 (d)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that whenever a 967 child is unable to safely remain at home with a parent, the most 968 appropriate available out-of-home placement must shall be chosen 969 after an assessment of the childâs needs and the availability of 970 caregivers qualified to meet the childâs needs, including 971 certain group or treatment settings that are appropriate for 972 addressing the needs of a high-acuity child. 973 (e)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that this section 974 applies to transitions between all out-of-home placements, 975 including, but not limited to, medical placements under s. 976 39.4078. 977 (2)âASSESSMENT AND PLACEMENT.âWhen any child is removed 978 from a home and placed in out-of-home care, a comprehensive 979 placement assessment process shall be completed in accordance 980 with s. 39.4022 or s. 39.4078, as applicable, to determine the 981 level of care needed by the child and match the child with the 982 most appropriate placement. 983 (a)âIn accordance with rules adopted by the department, the 984 department, or community-based care lead agency, or Child 985 Protection Team, if the child being evaluated has been 986 identified as a high-acuity child under s. 39.4078, must: 987 1.âCoordinate a multidisciplinary team staffing as 988 established in s. 39.4022 with the necessary participants for 989 the stated purpose of the staffing. 990 2.âConduct a trauma screening as soon as practicable after 991 the childâs removal from his or her home but no later than 21 992 days after the shelter hearing. If indicated as appropriate or 993 necessary by the screening, the department or community-based 994 care lead agency must, at a minimum: 995 a.âPromptly refer the child to appropriate trauma 996 assessment, which must be completed within 30 days, and if 997 appropriate, services and intervention as needed. To the extent 998 possible, the trauma screening, the assessment, and the services 999 and intervention must be integrated into the childâs overall 1000 behavioral health treatment planning and services. 1001 b.âIn accordance with s. 409.1415(2)(b)3.f., provide 1002 information and support, which may include, but need not be 1003 limited to, consultation, coaching, training, and referrals to 1004 services, to the caregiver of the child to help the caregiver 1005 respond to and care for the child in a trauma-informed and 1006 therapeutic manner. 1007 (b)âThe comprehensive placement assessment process may also 1008 include the use of an assessment instrument or tool that is best 1009 suited for the individual child and is able to identify a high 1010 acuity child. 1011 (c)âThe most appropriate available out-of-home placement 1012 shall be chosen after consideration by all members of the 1013 multidisciplinary team of all of the information and data 1014 gathered, including the results and recommendations of any 1015 evaluations conducted and considering the most appropriate 1016 placement of each child under ss. 39.4021 and 39.4022. 1017 (d)âPlacement decisions for each child in out-of-home 1018 placement shall be reviewed as often as necessary to ensure 1019 permanency for that child and address special issues related to 1020 this population of children. 1021 (e)âThe department, a community-based care lead agency, or 1022 a case management organization must document all placement 1023 assessments and placement decisions in the Florida Safe Families 1024 Network. 1025 (f)âIf it is determined during the comprehensive placement 1026 assessment process that: 1027 1.âResidential treatment as defined in s. 39.407 would be 1028 suitable for the child, the procedures in that section must be 1029 followed. 1030 2.âA child is classified as a high-acuity child, the 1031 procedures in s. 39.4078 must be followed. 1032 (g)âThe appropriate agencies and departments shall 1033 prioritize the placement of a high-acuity child who is taken 1034 into or currently in out-of-home care under this chapter into a 1035 specialized and appropriate placement, including, but not 1036 limited to, a medical bed or group home placement in a facility 1037 licensed or maintained by the department, the Department of 1038 Health, the Agency for Persons with Disabilities, or the Agency 1039 for Health Care Administration. 1040 Section 10.âSubsection (2) and paragraph (a) of subsection 1041 (3) of section 39.6012, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1042 39.6012âCase plan tasks; services.â 1043 (2)âThe case plan must include all available information 1044 that is relevant to the childâs care including, at a minimum: 1045 (a)âA description of the identified needs of the child 1046 while in care, including the needs of a child who has been 1047 evaluated and meets the criteria of a high-acuity child. The 1048 description of such needs must be specific enough for the parent 1049 or caregiver to sufficiently understand how to properly address 1050 any high-acuity medical conditions and the provision of care for 1051 such conditions to ensure the safe placement and care of the 1052 high-acuity child in compliance with s. 39.4078. 1053 (b)âA description of the plan for ensuring that the child 1054 receives safe and proper care and that services are provided to 1055 the child in order to address the childâs needs. To the extent 1056 available and accessible, all of the following health, mental 1057 health, and education information and records of the child must 1058 be attached to the case plan and updated throughout the judicial 1059 review process: 1060 1.âThe names and addresses of the childâs health, mental 1061 health, and educational providers.; 1062 2.âThe childâs grade level performance.; 1063 3.âThe childâs school record or, if the child is under the 1064 age of school entry, any records from a child care program, 1065 early education program, or preschool program.; 1066 4.âDocumentation of compliance or noncompliance with the 1067 attendance requirements under s. 39.604, if the child is 1068 enrolled in a child care program, early education program, or 1069 preschool program.; 1070 5.âAssurances that the childâs placement takes into account 1071 proximity to the school in which the child is enrolled at the 1072 time of placement.; 1073 6.âThe childâs immunizations.; 1074 7.âThe childâs known medical history, including any known 1075 health problems.; 1076 8.âThe childâs medications, if any.; and 1077 9.âAny other relevant health, mental health, and education 1078 information concerning the child. 1079 10.âAny other tasks that the Child Protection Team deems 1080 appropriate for a case plan prepared in accordance with s. 1081 39.4078 for a high-acuity child which are specific to addressing 1082 the childâs high-acuity needs and appropriate transition plans 1083 to more restrictive and less restrictive settings, regardless of 1084 whether the high-acuity designation is based on the childâs 1085 mental health, behavioral health, disability, or involvement 1086 with the juvenile justice system. 1087 (3)âIn addition to any other requirement, if the child is 1088 in an out-of-home placement, the case plan must include: 1089 (a)âA description of the type of placement in which the 1090 child is to be living, including if such placement is a medical 1091 bed in a medical placement for a high-acuity child. 1092 Section 11.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 39.6013, 1093 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1094 39.6013âCase plan amendments.â 1095 (1)âAfter the case plan has been developed under s. 1096 39.6011, the tasks and services agreed upon in the plan may not 1097 be changed or altered in any way except as provided in this 1098 section. If a high-acuity child is placed in a medical 1099 placement, the case plan must reflect the goals, services, and 1100 transition requirements identified in s. 39.4078. 1101 (2)âThe case plan may be amended at any time in order to 1102 change the goal of the plan, employ the use of concurrent 1103 planning, add or remove tasks the parent must complete to 1104 substantially comply with the plan, provide appropriate services 1105 for the child, and update the childâs health, mental health, and 1106 education records as required by s. 39.4078 or s. 39.6012. 1107 Section 12.âParagraph (k) is added to subsection (1) of 1108 section 391.025, Florida Statutes, to read: 1109 391.025âApplicability and scope.â 1110 (1)âThe Childrenâs Medical Services program consists of the 1111 following components: 1112 (k)âThe Medical Placement for High-acuity Children Act 1113 established under s. 39.4078. 1114 Section 13.âSubsection (1) of section 391.029, Florida 1115 Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (d) is added to subsection 1116 (2) and paragraph (d) is added to subsection (3) of that 1117 section, to read: 1118 391.029âProgram eligibility.â 1119 (1)âEligibility for the Childrenâs Medical Services program 1120 is based on the diagnosis of one or more chronic and serious 1121 medical conditions or meeting the criteria for a high-acuity 1122 child as defined in s. 39.01 and the familyâs need for 1123 specialized services. 1124 (2)âThe following individuals are eligible to receive 1125 services through the program: 1126 (d)âChildren or youth with complex behavioral or mental 1127 health needs from birth to 18 years of age who meet the criteria 1128 of a high-acuity child as defined in s. 39.01 or who are placed 1129 in a medical bed in a medical placement under s. 39.4078. 1130 (3)âSubject to the availability of funds, the following 1131 individuals may receive services through the Childrenâs Medical 1132 Services Safety Net program: 1133 (d)âChildren or youth with complex behavioral or mental 1134 health needs from birth to 18 years of age who meet the criteria 1135 of a high-acuity child as defined in s. 39.01 or who are placed 1136 in a medical bed in a medical placement under s. 39.4078. 1137 Section 14.âSubsection (5) of section 393.065, Florida 1138 Statutes, is amended to read: 1139 393.065âApplication and eligibility determination.â 1140 (5)âExcept as provided in subsections (6) and (7), if a 1141 client seeking enrollment in the developmental disabilities home 1142 and community-based services Medicaid waiver program meets the 1143 level of care requirement for an intermediate care facility for 1144 individuals with intellectual disabilities pursuant to 42 C.F.R. 1145 ss. 435.217(b)(1) and 440.150, the agency must assign the client 1146 to an appropriate preenrollment category pursuant to this 1147 subsection and must provide priority to clients waiting for 1148 waiver services in the following order: 1149 (a)âCategory 1, which includes clients deemed to be in 1150 crisis as described in rule and clients who meet the criteria of 1151 a high-acuity child as defined in s. 39.01, must be given first 1152 priority in moving from the preenrollment categories to the 1153 waiver. 1154 (b)âCategory 2, which includes clients in the preenrollment 1155 categories who are: 1156 1.âFrom the child welfare system with an open case in the 1157 Department of Children and Familiesâ statewide automated child 1158 welfare information system and who are either: 1159 a.âTransitioning out of the child welfare system into 1160 permanency; or 1161 b.âAt least 18 years but not yet 22 years of age and who 1162 need both waiver services and extended foster care services; or 1163 2.âAt least 18 years but not yet 22 years of age and who 1164 withdrew consent pursuant to s. 39.6251(5)(c) to remain in the 1165 extended foster care system. 1166 1167 For individuals who are at least 18 years but not yet 22 years 1168 of age and who are eligible under sub-subparagraph 1.b., the 1169 agency must provide waiver services, including residential 1170 habilitation, and must actively participate in transition 1171 planning activities, including, but not limited to, 1172 individualized service coordination, case management support, 1173 and ensuring continuity of care pursuant to s. 39.6035. The 1174 community-based care lead agency must fund room and board at the 1175 rate established in s. 409.145(3) and provide case management 1176 and related services as defined in s. 409.986(3)(f) s. 1177 409.986(3)(e). Individuals may receive both waiver services and 1178 services under s. 39.6251. Services may not duplicate services 1179 available through the Medicaid state plan. 1180 (c)âCategory 3, which includes, but is not required to be 1181 limited to, clients: 1182 1.âWhose caregiver has a documented condition that is 1183 expected to render the caregiver unable to provide care within 1184 the next 12 months and for whom a caregiver is required but no 1185 alternate caregiver is available; 1186 2.âAt substantial risk of incarceration or court commitment 1187 without supports; 1188 3.âWhose documented behaviors or physical needs place them 1189 or their caregiver at risk of serious harm and other supports 1190 are not currently available to alleviate the situation; or 1191 4.âWho are identified as ready for discharge within the 1192 next year from a state mental health hospital or skilled nursing 1193 facility and who require a caregiver but for whom no caregiver 1194 is available or whose caregiver is unable to provide the care 1195 needed. 1196 (d)âCategory 4, which includes, but is not required to be 1197 limited to, clients whose caregivers are 60 years of age or 1198 older and for whom a caregiver is required but no alternate 1199 caregiver is available. 1200 (e)âCategory 5, which includes, but is not required to be 1201 limited to, clients who are expected to graduate within the next 1202 12 months from secondary school and need support to obtain a 1203 meaningful day activity, maintain competitive employment, or 1204 pursue an accredited program of postsecondary education to which 1205 they have been accepted. 1206 (f)âCategory 6, which includes clients 21 years of age or 1207 older who do not meet the criteria for category 1, category 2, 1208 category 3, category 4, or category 5. 1209 (g)âCategory 7, which includes clients younger than 21 1210 years of age who do not meet the criteria for category 1, 1211 category 2, category 3, or category 4. 1212 1213 Within preenrollment categories 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7, the agency 1214 shall prioritize clients in the order of the date that the 1215 client is determined eligible for waiver services. A client 1216 within any preenrollment category who meets the criteria of a 1217 high-acuity child as defined in s. 39.01 whose high-acuity 1218 designation is related to a disability that otherwise makes the 1219 child eligible for services under this chapter must be placed in 1220 category 1 for priority placement in an appropriate medical bed 1221 in a medical placement in accordance with s. 39.4078 if the 1222 child is taken into or is currently in the custody of the 1223 Department of Children and Families under chapter 39. 1224 Section 15.âParagraph (p) of subsection (4), paragraph (a) 1225 of subsection (6), and paragraph (a) of subsection (7) of 1226 section 394.495, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph 1227 (r) is added to subsection (4) of that section, to read: 1228 394.495âChild and adolescent mental health system of care; 1229 programs and services.â 1230 (4)âThe array of services may include, but is not limited 1231 to: 1232 (p)âTrauma-informed services for children who have suffered 1233 sexual exploitation as defined in s. 39.01(83)(g) s. 1234 39.01(80)(g). 1235 (r)âPlacement in a medical bed in a medical placement under 1236 s. 39.4078. 1237 (6)âThe department shall contract for community action 1238 treatment teams throughout the state with the managing entities. 1239 A community action treatment team shall: 1240 (a)âProvide community-based behavioral health and support 1241 services to children from 11 to 13 years of age, adolescents, 1242 and young adults from 18 to 21 years of age with serious 1243 behavioral health conditions who are at risk of out-of-home 1244 placement as demonstrated by: 1245 1.âRepeated failures at less intensive levels of care; 1246 2.âTwo or more behavioral health hospitalizations; 1247 3.âInvolvement with the Department of Juvenile Justice; 1248 4.âA history of multiple episodes involving law 1249 enforcement; or 1250 5.âA record of poor academic performance or suspensions; or 1251 6.âA designation as a high-acuity child as defined in s. 1252 39.01 or placement in a medical bed in a medical placement under 1253 s. 39.4078. 1254 1255 Children younger than 11 years of age who otherwise meet the 1256 criteria in this paragraph may be candidates for such services 1257 if they demonstrate two or more of the characteristics listed in 1258 subparagraphs 1.-5. 1259 (7)(a)âThe department shall contract with managing entities 1260 for mobile response teams throughout the state to provide 1261 immediate, onsite behavioral health crisis services to children, 1262 adolescents, and young adults ages 18 to 25, inclusive, who: 1263 1.âHave an emotional disturbance; 1264 2.âAre experiencing an acute mental or emotional crisis; 1265 3.âAre experiencing escalating emotional or behavioral 1266 reactions and symptoms that impact their ability to function 1267 typically within the family, living situation, or community 1268 environment; or 1269 4.âAre served by the child welfare system and are 1270 experiencing or are at high risk of placement instability; or 1271 5.âHave been evaluated and meet the criteria of a high 1272 acuity child as defined in s. 39.01 or who are placed in a 1273 medical bed in a medical placement under s. 39.4078. 1274 Section 16.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (2) of 1275 section 409.145, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph 1276 (h) is added to subsection (1) of that section, to read: 1277 409.145âCare of children; âreasonable and prudent parentâ 1278 standard.âThe child welfare system of the department shall 1279 operate as a coordinated community-based system of care which 1280 empowers all caregivers for children in foster care to provide 1281 quality parenting, including approving or disapproving a childâs 1282 participation in activities based on the caregiverâs assessment 1283 using the âreasonable and prudent parentâ standard. 1284 (1)âSYSTEM OF CARE.âThe department shall develop, 1285 implement, and administer a coordinated community-based system 1286 of care for children who are found to be dependent and their 1287 families. This system of care must be directed toward the 1288 following goals: 1289 (h)âEnsure that a child who has been designated as a high 1290 acuity child after an assessment for such purpose has the most 1291 appropriate medical placement and necessary services, including 1292 transitions to more restrictive and less restrictive settings, 1293 to address the acute or chronic expression of the medical 1294 conditions that are the reason for the high-acuity designation. 1295 (2)âREASONABLE AND PRUDENT PARENT STANDARD.â 1296 (a)âDefinitions.âAs used in this subsection, the term: 1297 1.ââAge-appropriateâ means an activity or item that is 1298 generally accepted as suitable for a child of the same 1299 chronological age or level of maturity. Age appropriateness is 1300 based on the development of cognitive, emotional, physical, and 1301 behavioral capacity which is typical for an age or age group. 1302 2.ââCaregiverâ means a person with whom the child is placed 1303 in out-of-home care, or a designated official for a group care 1304 facility licensed by the department under s. 409.175. 1305 3.ââHigh-acuity childâ has the same meaning as in s. 39.01. 1306 4.3.ââReasonable and prudent parentâ standard means the 1307 standard of care used by a caregiver in determining whether to 1308 allow a child in his or her care to participate in 1309 extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities. This 1310 standard is characterized by careful and thoughtful parental 1311 decisionmaking that is intended to maintain a childâs health, 1312 safety, and best interest while encouraging the childâs 1313 emotional and developmental growth. 1314 (b)âApplication of standard of care.â 1315 1.âEvery child who comes into out-of-home care pursuant to 1316 this chapter is entitled to participate in age-appropriate 1317 extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities. 1318 2.âEach caregiver shall use the reasonable and prudent 1319 parent standard in determining whether to give permission for a 1320 child living in out-of-home care to participate in 1321 extracurricular, enrichment, or social activities. When using 1322 the reasonable and prudent parent standard, the caregiver must 1323 consider: 1324 a.âThe childâs age, maturity, and developmental level to 1325 maintain the overall health and safety of the child. 1326 b.âThe potential risk factors and the appropriateness of 1327 the extracurricular, enrichment, or social activity. 1328 c.âThe best interest of the child, based on information 1329 known by the caregiver. 1330 d.âThe importance of encouraging the childâs emotional and 1331 developmental growth. 1332 e.âThe importance of providing the child with the most 1333 family-like living experience possible. 1334 f.âThe behavioral history of the child and the childâs 1335 ability to safely participate in the proposed activity. 1336 1337 For a high-acuity child, the medical necessity of such child and 1338 the need for medical placement or transitions to more 1339 restrictive and less restrictive settings take priority over the 1340 reasonable and prudent parent standard until such time as the 1341 court determines that the acute or chronic expression of the 1342 medical conditions that are the reason for the high-acuity 1343 designation have been stabilized. 1344 Section 17.âParagraph (d) of subsection (2) of section 1345 409.166, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1346 409.166âChildren within the child welfare system; adoption 1347 assistance program.â 1348 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 1349 (d)ââDifficult-to-place childâ means: 1350 1.âA child whose permanent custody has been awarded to the 1351 department or to a licensed child-placing agency; 1352 2.âA child who has established significant emotional ties 1353 with his or her foster parents or is not likely to be adopted 1354 because he or she is: 1355 a.âEight years of age or older; 1356 b.âDevelopmentally disabled; 1357 c.âPhysically or emotionally handicapped; 1358 d.âA member of a racial group that is disproportionately 1359 represented among children described in subparagraph 1.; or 1360 e.âA member of a sibling group of any age, provided two or 1361 more members of a sibling group remain together for purposes of 1362 adoption; or 1363 f.âA high-acuity child as defined in s. 39.01; and 1364 3.âExcept when the child is being adopted by the childâs 1365 foster parents or relative caregivers, a child for whom a 1366 reasonable but unsuccessful effort has been made to place the 1367 child without providing a maintenance subsidy. 1368 Section 18.âSubsection (30) is added to section 409.906, 1369 Florida Statutes, to read: 1370 409.906âOptional Medicaid services.âSubject to specific 1371 appropriations, the agency may make payments for services which 1372 are optional to the state under Title XIX of the Social Security 1373 Act and are furnished by Medicaid providers to recipients who 1374 are determined to be eligible on the dates on which the services 1375 were provided. Any optional service that is provided shall be 1376 provided only when medically necessary and in accordance with 1377 state and federal law. Optional services rendered by providers 1378 in mobile units to Medicaid recipients may be restricted or 1379 prohibited by the agency. Nothing in this section shall be 1380 construed to prevent or limit the agency from adjusting fees, 1381 reimbursement rates, lengths of stay, number of visits, or 1382 number of services, or making any other adjustments necessary to 1383 comply with the availability of moneys and any limitations or 1384 directions provided for in the General Appropriations Act or 1385 chapter 216. If necessary to safeguard the stateâs systems of 1386 providing services to elderly and disabled persons and subject 1387 to the notice and review provisions of s. 216.177, the Governor 1388 may direct the Agency for Health Care Administration to amend 1389 the Medicaid state plan to delete the optional Medicaid service 1390 known as âIntermediate Care Facilities for the Developmentally 1391 Disabled.â Optional services may include: 1392 (30)âHIGH-ACUITY CHILD SERVICES.âThe agency may pay for a 1393 medical bed in a medical placement and any transitions to more 1394 restrictive and less restrictive settings that are required to 1395 appropriately serve a high-acuity child as defined in s. 39.01 1396 to ensure that a child designated as a high-acuity child has the 1397 most appropriate placement and services necessary to address the 1398 acute or chronic expression of the medical conditions that are 1399 the reason for the high-acuity designation. The agency may seek 1400 federal approval if necessary to implement this subsection. 1401 Section 19.âPresent paragraph (e) of subsection (3) of 1402 section 409.986, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph 1403 (f), and paragraph (j) is added to subsection (2) and a new 1404 paragraph (e) is added to subsection (3) of that section, to 1405 read: 1406 409.986âLegislative findings and intent; child protection 1407 and child welfare outcomes; definitions.â 1408 (2)âCHILD PROTECTION AND CHILD WELFARE OUTCOMES.âIt is the 1409 goal of the department to protect the best interest of children 1410 by achieving the following outcomes in conjunction with the 1411 community-based care lead agency, community-based 1412 subcontractors, and the community alliance: 1413 (j)âIf applicable, the needs of a high-acuity child are 1414 stabilized and the child is provided the most appropriate 1415 services and placements. 1416 (3)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this part, except as otherwise 1417 provided, the term: 1418 (e)ââHigh-acuity childâ has the same meaning as in s. 1419 39.01. 1420 Section 20.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 1421 934.255, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1422 934.255âSubpoenas in investigations of sexual offenses.â 1423 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 1424 (c)ââSexual abuse of a childâ means a criminal offense 1425 based on any conduct described in s. 39.01(83) s. 39.01(80). 1426 Section 21.âSubsection (5) of section 960.065, Florida 1427 Statutes, is amended to read: 1428 960.065âEligibility for awards.â 1429 (5)âA person is not ineligible for an award pursuant to 1430 paragraph (2)(a), paragraph (2)(b), or paragraph (2)(c) if that 1431 person is a victim of sexual exploitation of a child as defined 1432 in s. 39.01(83)(g) s. 39.01(80)(g). 1433 Section 22.âSubsection (24) of section 984.03, Florida 1434 Statutes, is amended to read: 1435 984.03âDefinitions.âWhen used in this chapter, the term: 1436 (24)ââNeglectâ has the same meaning as in s. 39.01 s. 1437 39.01(53). 1438 Section 23.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.